test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-lex_kalved_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - kalveđ: # MLO checked
    kalveđ+V+Inf: kalveđ
    kalveđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kalvam
    kalveđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: kalvah
    kalveđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kalva
    kalveđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: kalveen
    kalveđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: kalvevettee
    kalveđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: kalvev
    kalveđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: kalvep
    kalveđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: kalvevetteđ
    kalveđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: kalveh
    kalveđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: kolvim
    kalveđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: kolvih
    kalveđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: koolvij
    kalveđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: koolvijm
    kalveđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: koolvijd
    kalveđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: koolvijn
    kalveđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: koolvijm
    kalveđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: koolvijd
    kalveđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: kolvii
    kalveđ+V+Cond+Sg1: kalvaččim
    kalveđ+V+Cond+Sg2: kalvaččih
    kalveđ+V+Cond+Sg3: kalvaččij
    kalveđ+V+Cond+Du1: kalvaččáim
    kalveđ+V+Cond+Du2: kalvaččáid
    kalveđ+V+Cond+Du3: kalvaččáin
    kalveđ+V+Cond+Pl1: kalvaččijm
    kalveđ+V+Cond+Pl2: kalvaččijd
    kalveđ+V+Cond+Pl3: kalvaččii
    kalveđ+V+Pot+Sg1: kalveem
    kalveđ+V+Pot+Sg2: kalveeh
    kalveđ+V+Pot+Sg3: koolviš
    kalveđ+V+Pot+Du1: kolvižeen
    kalveđ+V+Pot+Du2: koolvišvettee
    kalveđ+V+Pot+Du3: kolvižává
    kalveđ+V+Pot+Pl1: kolvižep
    kalveđ+V+Pot+Pl2: koolvišvetteđ
    kalveđ+V+Pot+Pl3: kolvižeh
#    kalveđ+V+Imprt+Sg1: kalvoom
    kalveđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: kalve
    kalveđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: kalvos
    kalveđ+V+Imprt+Du1: kalvoon
    kalveđ+V+Imprt+Du2: kalvee
    kalveđ+V+Imprt+Du3: kalvoos
    kalveđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: kalvoop
    kalveđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: kalveđ
    kalveđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: kalvoos
    kalveđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: kalve
    kalveđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: kalvam
    kalveđ+V+Cond+ConNeg: kalvaččii
    kalveđ+V+Pot+ConNeg: kalvaa
    kalveđ+V+PrsPrc: kalvee
    kalveđ+V+PrfPrc: kalvam
    kalveđ+V+Actio: kalvem
    kalveđ+V+Actio+Ess: kalvemin
    kalveđ+V+Actio+Loc: kalvemist
    kalveđ+V+Actio+Ill: kalvemân
    kalveđ+V+Actio+Com: kalvedijn
    kalveđ+V+VAbess: kalvehánnáá


  Verb - pihteđ: # MLO checked
    pihteđ+V+Inf: pihteđ
    pihteđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pivtám
    pihteđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: pivtáh
    pihteđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: pihtá
    pihteđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: pihteen
    pihteđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: pihtevettee
    pihteđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: pihtev
    pihteđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: pihtep
    pihteđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: pihtevetteđ
    pihteđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: pihteh
    pihteđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: pihtim
    pihteđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: pihtih
    pihteđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: piivtij
    pihteđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: piivtijm
    pihteđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: piivtijd
    pihteđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: piivtijn
    pihteđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: piivtijm
    pihteđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: piivtijd
    pihteđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: pihtii
    pihteđ+V+Cond+Sg1: pivtáččim
    pihteđ+V+Cond+Sg2: pivtáččih
    pihteđ+V+Cond+Sg3: pivtáččij
    pihteđ+V+Cond+Du1: pivtáččáim
    pihteđ+V+Cond+Du2: pivtáččáid
    pihteđ+V+Cond+Du3: pivtáččáin
    pihteđ+V+Cond+Pl1: pivtáččijm
    pihteđ+V+Cond+Pl2: pivtáččijd
    pihteđ+V+Cond+Pl3: pivtáččii
    pihteđ+V+Pot+Sg1: pihteem
    pihteđ+V+Pot+Sg2: pihteeh
    pihteđ+V+Pot+Sg3: piivtiš
    pihteđ+V+Pot+Du1: pivtižeen
    pihteđ+V+Pot+Du2: piivtišvettee
    pihteđ+V+Pot+Du3: pivtižává
    pihteđ+V+Pot+Pl1: pivtižep
    pihteđ+V+Pot+Pl2: piivtišvetteđ
    pihteđ+V+Pot+Pl3: pivtižeh
#    pihteđ+V+Imprt+Sg1: pihtoom # ?
    pihteđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: pivte
    pihteđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: pivtos
    pihteđ+V+Imprt+Du1: pihtoon
    pihteđ+V+Imprt+Du2: pihtee
    pihteđ+V+Imprt+Du3: pihtoos
    pihteđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: pihtoop
    pihteđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: pihteđ
    pihteđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: pihtoos
    pihteđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: pivte
    pihteđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: pihtám
    pihteđ+V+Cond+ConNeg: pivtáččii
    pihteđ+V+Pot+ConNeg: pihtáá
    pihteđ+V+PrsPrc: pihtee
    pihteđ+V+PrfPrc: pihtám
    pihteđ+V+Actio: pihtem
    pihteđ+V+Actio+Ess: pihtemin
    pihteđ+V+Actio+Loc: pihtemist
    pihteđ+V+Actio+Ill: pihtemân
    pihteđ+V+Actio+Com: pivtedijn
    pihteđ+V+VAbess: pivtehánnáá


  Verb - pohteđ: # MLO checked
    pohteđ+V+Inf: pohteđ
    pohteđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: povtám
    pohteđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: povtáh
    pohteđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: pohtá
    pohteđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: pohteen
    pohteđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: pohtevettee
    pohteđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: pohtev
    pohteđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: pohtep
    pohteđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: pohtevetteđ
    pohteđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: pohteh
    pohteđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: pohtim
    pohteđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: pohtih
    pohteđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: poovtij
    pohteđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: poovtijm
    pohteđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: poovtijd
    pohteđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: poovtijn
    pohteđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: poovtijm
    pohteđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: poovtijd
    pohteđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: pohtii
    pohteđ+V+Cond+Sg1: povtáččim
    pohteđ+V+Cond+Sg2: povtáččih
    pohteđ+V+Cond+Sg3: povtáččij
    pohteđ+V+Cond+Du1: povtáččáim
    pohteđ+V+Cond+Du2: povtáččáid
    pohteđ+V+Cond+Du3: povtáččáin
    pohteđ+V+Cond+Pl1: povtáččijm
    pohteđ+V+Cond+Pl2: povtáččijd
    pohteđ+V+Cond+Pl3: povtáččii
    pohteđ+V+Pot+Sg1: pohteem
    pohteđ+V+Pot+Sg2: pohteeh
    pohteđ+V+Pot+Sg3: poovtiš
    pohteđ+V+Pot+Du1: povtižeen
    pohteđ+V+Pot+Du2: poovtišvettee
    pohteđ+V+Pot+Du3: povtižává
    pohteđ+V+Pot+Pl1: povtižep
    pohteđ+V+Pot+Pl2: poovtišvetteđ
    pohteđ+V+Pot+Pl3: povtižeh
#    pohteđ+V+Imprt+Sg1: pohtoom # ?
    pohteđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: povte
    pohteđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: povtos
    pohteđ+V+Imprt+Du1: pohtoon
    pohteđ+V+Imprt+Du2: pohtee
    pohteđ+V+Imprt+Du3: pohtoos
    pohteđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: pohtoop
    pohteđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: pohteđ
    pohteđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: pohtoos
    pohteđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: povte
    pohteđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: pohtám
    pohteđ+V+Cond+ConNeg: povtáččii
    pohteđ+V+Pot+ConNeg: pohtáá
    pohteđ+V+PrsPrc: pohtee
    pohteđ+V+PrfPrc: pohtám
    pohteđ+V+Actio: pohtem
    pohteđ+V+Actio+Ess: pohtemin
    pohteđ+V+Actio+Loc: pohtemist
    pohteđ+V+Actio+Ill: pohtemân
    pohteđ+V+Actio+Com: povtedijn
    pohteđ+V+VAbess: povtehánnáá


  Verb - mušteđ: # MLO checked
    mušteđ+V+Inf: mušteđ
    mušteđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: muštám
    mušteđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: muštáh
    mušteđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: muštá
    mušteđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: mušteen
    mušteđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: muštevettee
    mušteđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: muštev
    mušteđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: muštep
    mušteđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: muštevetteđ
    mušteđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: mušteh
    mušteđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: muštim
    mušteđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: muštih
    mušteđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: muuštij
    mušteđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: muuštijm
    mušteđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: muuštijd
    mušteđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: muuštijn
    mušteđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: muuštijm
    mušteđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: muuštijd
    mušteđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: muštii
    mušteđ+V+Cond+Sg1: muštáččim
    mušteđ+V+Cond+Sg2: muštáččih
    mušteđ+V+Cond+Sg3: muštáččij
    mušteđ+V+Cond+Du1: muštáččáim
    mušteđ+V+Cond+Du2: muštáččáid
    mušteđ+V+Cond+Du3: muštáččáin
    mušteđ+V+Cond+Pl1: muštáččijm
    mušteđ+V+Cond+Pl2: muštáččijd
    mušteđ+V+Cond+Pl3: muštáččii
    mušteđ+V+Pot+Sg1: mušteem
    mušteđ+V+Pot+Sg2: mušteeh
    mušteđ+V+Pot+Sg3: muuštiš
    mušteđ+V+Pot+Du1: muštižeen
    mušteđ+V+Pot+Du2: muuštišvettee
    mušteđ+V+Pot+Du3: muštižává
    mušteđ+V+Pot+Pl1: muštižep
    mušteđ+V+Pot+Pl2: muuštišvetteđ
    mušteđ+V+Pot+Pl3: muštižeh
#    mušteđ+V+Imprt+Sg1: muštoom # ?
    mušteđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: mušte
    mušteđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: muštos
    mušteđ+V+Imprt+Du1: muštoon
    mušteđ+V+Imprt+Du2: muštee
    mušteđ+V+Imprt+Du3: muštoos
    mušteđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: muštoop
    mušteđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: mušteđ
    mušteđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: muštoos
    mušteđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: mušte
    mušteđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: muštám
    mušteđ+V+Cond+ConNeg: muštáččii
    mušteđ+V+Pot+ConNeg: muštáá
    mušteđ+V+PrsPrc: muštee
    mušteđ+V+PrfPrc: muštám
    mušteđ+V+Actio: muštem
    mušteđ+V+Actio+Ess: muštemin
    mušteđ+V+Actio+Loc: muštemist
    mušteđ+V+Actio+Ill: muštemân
    mušteđ+V+Actio+Com: muštedijn
    mušteđ+V+VAbess: muštehánnáá
